Missouri, session 2026, HB2433.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 67.1360, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 67.1360, to read as follows:
67.1360. 1. The governing body of the following cities and counties may impose a
tax as provided in this section:
(1) A city with a population of more than seven thousand and less than seven
thousand five hundred;
(2) A county with a population of over nine thousand six hundred and less than
twelve thousand which has a total assessed valuation of at least sixty-three million dollars, if
the county submits the issue to the voters of such county prior to January 1, 2003;
(3) A third class city which is the county seat of a county of the third classification
without a township form of government with a population of at least twenty-five thousand but
not more than thirty thousand inhabitants;
(4) Any fourth class city having, according to the last federal decennial census, a
population of more than one thousand eight hundred fifty inhabitants but less than one
thousand nine hundred fifty inhabitants in a county of the first classification with a charter
form of government and having a population of greater than six hundred thousand but less
than nine hundred thousand inhabitants;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2433 2
(5) Any city having a population of more than three thousand but less than eight
thousand inhabitants in a county of the fourth classification having a population of greater
than forty-eight thousand inhabitants;
(6) Any city having a population of less than two hundred fifty inhabitants in a county
of the fourth classification having a population of greater than forty-eight thousand
inhabitants;
(7) Any fourth class city having a population of more than two thousand five hundred
but less than three thousand inhabitants in a county of the third classification having a
population of more than twenty-five thousand but less than twenty-seven thousand
inhabitants;
(8) Any third class city with a population of more than three thousand two hundred
but less than three thousand three hundred located in a county of the third classification
having a population of more than thirty-five thousand but less than thirty-six thousand;
(9) Any county of the second classification without a township form of government
and a population of less than thirty thousand;
(10) Any city of the fourth class in a county of the second classification without a
township form of government and a population of less than thirty thousand;
(11) Any county of the third classification with a township form of government and a
population of at least twenty-eight thousand but not more than thirty thousand;
(12) Any city of the fourth class with a population of more than one thousand eight
hundred but less than two thousand in a county of the third classification with a township
form of government and a population of at least twenty-eight thousand but not more than
thirty thousand;
(13) Any city of the third class with a population of more than seven thousand two
hundred but less than seven thousand five hundred within a county of the third classification
with a population of more than twenty-one thousand but less than twenty-three thousand;
(14) Any fourth class city having a population of more than two thousand eight
hundred but less than three thousand one hundred inhabitants in a county of the third
classification with a township form of government having a population of more than eight
thousand four hundred but less than nine thousand inhabitants;
(15) Any fourth class city with a population of more than four hundred seventy but
less than five hundred twenty inhabitants located in a county of the third classification with a
population of more than fifteen thousand nine hundred but less than sixteen thousand
inhabitants;
(16) Any third class city with a population of more than three thousand eight hundred
but less than four thousand inhabitants located in a county of the third classification with a

HB 2433 3
population of more than fifteen thousand nine hundred but less than sixteen thousand
inhabitants;
(17) Any fourth class city with a population of more than four thousand three hundred
but less than four thousand five hundred inhabitants located in a county of the third
classification without a township form of government with a population greater than sixteen
thousand but less than sixteen thousand two hundred inhabitants;
(18) Any fourth class city with a population of more than two thousand four hundred
but less than two thousand six hundred inhabitants located in a county of the first
classification without a charter form of government with a population of more than fifty-five
thousand but less than sixty thousand inhabitants;
(19) Any fourth class city with a population of more than two thousand five hundred
but less than two thousand six hundred inhabitants located in a county of the third
classification with a population of more than nineteen thousand one hundred but less than
nineteen thousand two hundred inhabitants;
(20) Any county of the third classification without a township form of government
with a population greater than sixteen thousand but less than sixteen thousand two hundred
inhabitants;
(21) Any county of the second classification with a population of more than forty-
four thousand but less than fifty thousand inhabitants;
(22) Any third class city with a population of more than nine thousand five hundred
but less than nine thousand seven hundred inhabitants located in a county of the first
classification without a charter form of government and with a population of more than one
hundred ninety-eight thousand but less than one hundred ninety-eight thousand two hundred
inhabitants;
(23) Any city of the fourth classification with more than five thousand two hundred
but less than five thousand three hundred inhabitants located in a county of the third
classification without a township form of government and with more than twenty-four
thousand five hundred but less than twenty-four thousand six hundred inhabitants;
(24) Any third class city with a population of more than nineteen thousand nine
hundred but less than twenty thousand in a county of the first classification without a charter
form of government and with a population of more than one hundred ninety-eight thousand
but less than one hundred ninety-eight thousand two hundred inhabitants;
(25) Any city of the fourth classification with more than two thousand six hundred
but less than two thousand seven hundred inhabitants located in any county of the third
classification without a township form of government and with more than fifteen thousand
three hundred but less than fifteen thousand four hundred inhabitants;

HB 2433 4
(26) Any county of the third classification without a township form of government
and with more than fourteen thousand nine hundred but less than fifteen thousand inhabitants;
(27) Any city of the fourth classification with more than five thousand four hundred
but fewer than five thousand five hundred inhabitants and located in more than one county;
(28) Any city of the fourth classification with more than six thousand three hundred
but fewer than six thousand five hundred inhabitants and located in more than one county
through the creation of a tourism district which may include, in addition to the geographic
area of such city, the area encompassed by the portion of the school district, located within a
county of the first classification with more than ninety-three thousand eight hundred but
fewer than ninety-three thousand nine hundred inhabitants, having an average daily
attendance for school year 2005-06 between one thousand eight hundred and one thousand
nine hundred;
100 (29) Any city of the fourth classification with more than seven thousand seven
101 hundred but less than seven thousand eight hundred inhabitants located in a county of the first
102 classification with more than ninety-three thousand eight hundred but less than ninety-three
103 thousand nine hundred inhabitants;
104 (30) Any city of the fourth classification with more than two thousand nine hundred
105 but less than three thousand inhabitants located in a county of the first classification with
106 more than seventy-three thousand seven hundred but less than seventy-three thousand eight
107 hundred inhabitants;
108 (31) Any city of the third classification with more than nine thousand three hundred
109 but less than nine thousand four hundred inhabitants;
110 (32) Any city of the fourth classification with more than three thousand eight hundred
111 but fewer than three thousand nine hundred inhabitants and located in any county of the first
112 classification with more than thirty-nine thousand seven hundred but fewer than thirty-nine
113 thousand eight hundred inhabitants;
114 (33) Any city of the fourth classification with more than one thousand eight hundred
115 but fewer than one thousand nine hundred inhabitants and located in any county of the first
116 classification with more than one hundred thirty-five thousand four hundred but fewer than
117 one hundred thirty-five thousand five hundred inhabitants;
118 (34) Any county of the third classification without a township form of government
119 and with more than twelve thousand one hundred but fewer than twelve thousand two
120 hundred inhabitants;
121 (35) Any city of the fourth classification with more than three thousand eight hundred
122 but fewer than four thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county; provided,
123 however, that motels owned by not-for-profit organizations are exempt;

HB 2433 5
124 (36) Any city of the fourth classification with more than five thousand but fewer than
125 five thousand five hundred inhabitants and located in any county with a charter form of
126 government and with more than two hundred thousand but fewer than three hundred fifty
127 thousand inhabitants; [or]
128 (37) Any city with more than four thousand but fewer than five thousand five hundred
129 inhabitants and located in any county of the fourth classification with more than thirty
130 thousand but fewer than forty-two thousand inhabitants; or
131 (38) Any city with more than four thousand four hundred but fewer than four
132 thousand nine hundred inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with more
133 than thirty thousand but fewer than thirty-five thousand inhabitants.
134 2. The governing body of any city or county listed in subsection 1 of this section may
135 impose a tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels,
136 motels, bed and breakfast inns, and campgrounds and any docking facility that rents slips to
137 recreational boats that are used by transients for sleeping, which shall be at least two percent
138 but not more than five percent per occupied room per night, except that such tax shall not
139 become effective unless the governing body of the city or county submits to the voters of the
140 city or county at a state general, primary, or special election, a proposal to authorize the
141 governing body of the city or county to impose a tax pursuant to the provisions of this section
142 and section 67.1362. The tax authorized by this section and section 67.1362 shall be in
143 addition to any charge paid to the owner or operator and shall be in addition to any and all
144 taxes imposed by law and the proceeds of such tax shall be used by the city or county solely
145 for funding the promotion of tourism. Such tax shall be stated separately from all other
146 charges and taxes.
✔